sl-SI: Stran stopala: Obe strani; Leva; Desna; Drugo
lt-LT: Pėdos pusė: Dvipusė; Kairė; Dešinė; Kita
it: Lato del piede: Entrambi i lati; A sinistra; A destra; Altro
en: Foot side: Both sides; Left; Right; Other
nb: Fotside: Begge sider; Venstre; Høyre; Annet
pt-PT: Lado do pé: Ambos os lados; Esquerda; Direita; Outro
tr: Ayak tarafı: İki taraf; Sol; Sağ; Diğer
th: ข้างเท้า: สองข้าง; ด้านซ้าย; ด้านขวา; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Strana chodidla: Obe strany; Vľavo; Vpravo; Iné
hr-HR: Strana stopala: Obje strane; Lijeva; Desna; Ostalo
ru: Сторона стопы: Обе стороны; Слева; Справа; Другой
fi: Jalan puoli: Molemmin puolin; Vasen; Oikea; Muu
es: Lado del pie: Ambos lados; Izquierda; Derecha; Otros
da: Fodside: Begge sider; Venstre; Højre; Andet
hu: Láb oldala: Mindkét oldal; Bal oldal; Jobb oldal; Egyéb
ko: 발 측면: 양쪽; 왼쪽; 오른쪽; 기타
bg-BG: Страна на стъпалото: И двете страни; Вляво; Вдясно; Други
vi: Bên chân: Cả hai phía; Trái; Phải; Khác
ro-RO: Partea piciorului: Ambele părți; Stânga; Dreapta; Altele
cs: Strana nohy: Obě strany; Levá strana; Pravá strana; Jiné
zh-TW: 足部側別: 兩側通用; 左; 右; 其他
de: Fußseite: Beide Seiten; Links; Rechts; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Lado do pé: Ambos os lados; Esquerda; Direita; Outro
sv: Fotsida: Båda sidor; Vänster; Höger; Övrigt
ja: 左右（足）: 両側; 左; 右; その他
nl: Voetzijde: Tweezijdig; Links; Rechts; Andere
el: Πλευρά ποδιού: Και οι δύο πλευρές; Αριστερά; Δικαίωμα; Άλλο
zh-CN: 适配脚: 双手; 左; 右; 其他
pl: Strona stopy: Obie strony; Lewy; Prawy; Inne
fr: Côté du pied: Deux côtés; Gauche; Droite; Autre